apertium-dan.dan.dix
<pardef n="strop__n" c="autoconcord:ut,sgpl">
  <e>       <p><l></l>                    <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-both\Ø_LR_s\S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>pen</l>                 <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>per</l>                 <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>perne</l>               <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
</pardef>


<pardef n="st/ad__n" c="autoconcord:ut,sgpl"> <!-- Common; ~ad / ~aden / ~æder / ~æderne -->
  <e>       <p><l>ad</l>                  <r>ad<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-both\Ø_LR_s\S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>aden</l>                <r>ad<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>æder</l>                <r>ad<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>æderne</l>              <r>ad<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="snowboard__n" c="autoconcord:nt,sgpl"> <!-- Neuter; ~ / ~et / ~s / ~ene -->
  <e>       <p><l></l>                    <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-both\Ø_LR_s\S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>et</l>                  <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>                   <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="'_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ene</l>                 <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="b/onde__n" c="autoconcord:ut,sgpl"> <!-- Common; ~onde / ~onden / ~ønderr / ~ønderrne -->
  <e>       <p><l>onde</l>                <r>onde<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-both\Ø_LR_s\S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>onden</l>               <r>onde<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ønder</l>               <r>onde<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ønderne</l>             <r>onde<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="guf__n" c="autoconcord:nt,sgpl"> <!-- Neuter; ~ / ~fet / # / #; uncountable -->
  <e>       <p><l></l>                    <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-both\Ø_LR_s\S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>fet</l>                 <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>fer</l>                 <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ferne</l>               <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="bøf__n" c="autoconcord:ut,sgpl"> <!-- Neuter; ~ / ~fet / # / #; uncouutable -->
  <e>       <p><l></l>                    <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-both\Ø_LR_s\S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>fen</l>                 <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>fer</l>                 <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ferne</l>               <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="glug__n" c="autoconcord:ut,sgpl"> <!-- Common; ~ / ~gen / ~s / ~gene -->
  <e>       <p><l></l>                    <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-both\Ø_LR_s\S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>gen</l>                 <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ger</l>                 <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="'_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>gerne</l>               <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
</pardef>


<pardef n="blog__n" c="autoconcord:ut,sgpl"> <!-- Common; ~ / ~gen / ~s / ~gene -->
  <e>       <p><l></l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-both\Ø_LR_s\S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>gen</l>     <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="'_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>sne</l>     <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="jitterbug__n" c="autoconcord:ut,sgpl"> <!-- Common; ~ / ~gen / ~ / ~gene -->
  <e>       <p><l></l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-both\Ø_LR_s\S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>gen</l>     <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>gene</l>    <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="coach__n" c="autoconcord:ut,sgpl"> <!-- Common; ~ / ~en / ~es / ~ene -->
  <e>       <p><l></l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-both\Ø_LR_s\S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>en</l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>es</l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="'_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ene</l>     <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="drink__n" c="autoconcord:ut,sgpl"> <!-- Common; ~ / ~en / ~s / ~sne -->
  <e>       <p><l></l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-both\Ø_LR_s\S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>en</l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="'_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>sne</l>     <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="event__n" c="autoconcord:ut,sgpl"> <!-- Common; ~ / ~en / ~s / ~ene -->
  <e>       <p><l></l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-both\Ø_LR_s\S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>en</l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="'_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ene</l>     <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
</pardef>


<pardef n="metal__n" c="autoconcord:nt,sgpl"> <!-- Neuter; ~ / ~let / ~ler / ~lerne -->
  <e>       <p><l></l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-both\Ø_LR_s\S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>let</l>     <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ler</l>     <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>lerne</l>   <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="basketball">      <i>basketball</i><par n="drink__n"/></e>
<e lm="blog">            <i>blog</i><par n="blog__n"/></e>
<e lm="bonde">           <i>b</i><par n="b/onde__n"/></e>
<e lm="småbonde">           <i>småb</i><par n="b/onde__n"/></e>
<e lm="storbonde">           <i>storb</i><par n="b/onde__n"/></e>
<e lm="bug">             <i>bug</i><par n="blog__n"/></e>
<e lm="bøf">                      <i>bøf</i><par n="bøf__n"/></e>
<e lm="coach">           <i>coach</i><par n="coach__n"/></e>
<e lm="date">            <i>date</i><par n="drink__n"/></e>
<e lm="download">        <i>download</i><par n="drink__n"/></e>
<e lm="drink">           <i>drink</i><par n="drink__n"/></e>
<e lm="forstad">         <i>forst</i><par n="st/ad__n"/></e>
<e lm="guf">             <i>guf</i><par n="guf__n"/></e>
<e lm="hal">             <i>hal</i><par n="metal__n"/></e>
<e lm="hotel">           <i>hotel</i><par n="metal__n"/></e>
<e lm="hovedstad">       <i>hovedst</i><par n="st/ad__n"/></e>
<e lm="humbug">          <i>humbug</i><par n="jitterbug__n"/></e>
<e lm="interval">        <i>interval</i><par n="metal__n"/></e>
<e lm="jitterbug">       <i>jitterbug</i><par n="jitterbug__n"/></e>
<e lm="joint">           <i>joint</i><par n="drink__n"/></e>
<e lm="kapel">           <i>kapel</i><par n="metal__n"/></e>
<e lm="købstad" a="PT">  <i>købst</i><par n="st/ad__n"/></e>
<e lm="link">            <i>link</i><par n="snowboard__n"/></e>
<e lm="metal">           <i>metal</i><par n="metal__n"/></e>
<e lm="motel">           <i>motel</i><par n="metal__n"/></e>
<e lm="nul">             <i>nul</i><par n="metal__n"/></e>
<e lm="paraplydræg" a="PT" c="domain:sjöochhav"><i>paraplydræg</i><par n="blog__n"/></e>
<e lm="script">          <i>script</i><par n="snowboard__n"/></e>
<e lm="snowboard">       <i>snowboard</i><par n="snowboard__n"/></e>
<e lm="dashboard">       <i>dashboard</i><par n="snowboard__n"/></e>
<e lm="sportsevent">     <i>sportsevent</i><par n="event__n"/></e>
<e lm="stad">            <i>st</i><par n="st/ad__n"/></e>
<e lm="stationcar">      <i>stationcar</i><par n="drink__n"/></e>
<e lm="stel">            <i>stel</i><par n="metal__n"/></e>
<e lm="volleyball">      <i>volleyball</i><par n="drink__n"/></e>
<e lm="luftkastel">                 <i>luftkastel</i><par n="metal__n"/></e>
<e lm="luksushotel">              <i>luksushotel</i><par n="metal__n"/></e>
<e lm="kartel">              <i>kartel</i><par n="metal__n"/></e>
<e lm="nul">                      <i>nul</i><par n="metal__n"/></e>
<e lm="nøgletal">                <i>nøgletal</i><par n="metal__n"/></e>
<e lm="personel">                 <i>personel</i><par n="metal__n"/></e>
<e lm="spræl">                    <i>spræl</i><par n="metal__n"/></e>
<e lm="strop">                    <i>strop</i><par n="strop__n"/></e>
<e lm="tungmetal">                <i>tungmetal</i><par n="metal__n"/></e>
<e lm="badehotel"><i>badehotel</i><par n="metal__n"/></e>
<e lm="delingstal"><i>delingstal</i><par n="metal__n"/></e>
<e lm="ædelmetal"><i>ædelmetal</i><par n="metal__n"/></e>
<e lm="fjeldbonde"><i>fjeldb</i><par n="b/onde__n"/></e>
<e lm="fåtal"><i>fåtal</i><par n="metal__n"/></e>
<e lm="fyrretal"><i>fyrretal</i><par n="metal__n"/></e>
<e lm="glug"><i>glug</i><par n="glug__n"/></e>
<e lm="gravkapel"><i>gravkapel</i><par n="metal__n"/></e>
<e lm="hjemstad"><i>hjemst</i><par n="st/ad__n"/></e>
<e lm="kastel"><i>kastel</i><par n="metal__n"/></e>
<e lm="købstad"><i>købstad</i><par n="st/ad__n"/></e>
<e lm="kostumebal"><i>kostumebal</i><par n="metal__n"/></e>
<e lm="måltal"><i>måltal</i><par n="metal__n"/></e>
<e lm="odelsbonde"><i>odelsb</i><par n="b/onde__n"/></e>
<e lm="ceremoniel"><i>ceremoniel</i><par n="metal__n"/></e>
<e lm="chatol"><i>chatol</i><par n="metal__n"/></e>
<e lm="slotskabel"><i>slotskapel</i><par n="metal__n"/></e>
<e lm="småbonde"><i>småbonde</i><par n="b/onde__n"/></e>
<e lm="hakkebøf">                      <i>hakkebøf</i><par n="bøf__n"/></e>
<e lm="køpstad"><i>køpst</i><par n="st/ad__n"/></e>
